Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.551

Leave provisions.

The board of trustees of each college district shall adopt for each community and technical college under its jurisdiction written policies on granting leaves to employees of the district and those colleges, including but not limited to leaves for attendance at official or private institutions and conferences; professional leaves for personnel consistent with the provisions of RCW 28B.10.650; leaves for illness, injury, bereavement, and emergencies, consistent with RCW 28B.50.4893, and except as otherwise in this section provided, all with such compensation as the board of trustees may prescribe, except that the board shall grant to all such persons leave with full compensation for illness, injury, bereavement and emergencies as follows:

(1) For persons under contract to be employed, or otherwise employed, for at least three quarters, not more than twelve days per year, commencing with the first day on which work is to be performed; provisions of any contract in force on June 12, 1980, which conflict with requirements of this subsection shall continue in effect until contract expiration; after expiration, any new contract executed between the parties shall be consistent with this subsection;

(2)(a) Such leave entitlement may be accumulated after the first three-quarter period of employment for full-time employees, and may be taken at any time;

(b) For part-time academic employees, such leave entitlement shall be accumulated after the first quarter of employment by a college district or the first quarter after June 8, 2000, whichever is later, and may be taken at any time;

(3) Leave for illness, injury, bereavement and emergencies heretofore accumulated pursuant to law, rule, regulation or policy by persons presently employed by college districts and community and technical colleges shall be added to such leave accumulated under this section;

(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section or other law, accumulated leave under this section not taken at the time such person retires or ceases to be employed by college districts or community and technical colleges shall not be compensable;

(5) Accumulated leave for illness, injury, bereavement and emergencies shall be transferred from one college district to another or between a college district and the following: Any state agency, any educational service district, any school district, or any other institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;

(6) Leave accumulated by a person in a college district or community and technical college prior to leaving that district or college may, under the policy of the board of trustees, be granted to such person when he or she returns to the employment of that district or college; and

(7) Employees of the Seattle Vocational Institute are exempt from this section until July 1, 1993.

[ 2006 c 243 s 1; 2000 c 128 s 3; 1995 c 119 s 1; 1991 c 238 s 59; 1980 c 182 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 173 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 148; 1973 c 62 s 22; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 7. Formerly RCW 28.85.551.]

NOTES:

Application—2006 c 243: "This act applies only to leave accumulated on or after June 7, 2006." [ 2006 c 243 s 2.]

Construction—2000 c 128: See note following RCW 28B.52.220.

Severability—1980 c 182: See note following RCW 41.04.340.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 173: See notes following RCW 28B.10.650.

Savings—Severability—1973 c 62: See notes following RCW 28B.10.510.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.